Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Qualified Business or Industry — Companies and Their Affiliates

§ 57-99-1.
Definitions.

As used in Sections 57-99-1 through 57-99-9, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Qualified business or industry” means any company and affiliates thereof, pursuant to rules and regulations of the MDA, which is:

A project that has been certified by the MMEIA as a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) and creates at least one thousand five hundred (1,500) jobs within sixty (60) months of the beginning of the project;

A project that has been certified by the MMEIA as a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii) and creates at least five hundred (500) jobs within seventy-two (72) months of the beginning of the project;

A project:

1. That has been certified by the MMEIA as a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii);

2. Creates at least twenty-five (25) jobs within sixty (60) months of the beginning of the project; and

3. In which the average annual wages and taxable benefits of the jobs created by such project are at least one hundred ten percent (110%) of the most recently published average annual wage of the state or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the project is located, as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser; or

A project:

1. That has been certified by the MMEIA as a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix);

2. That creates at least twenty-five (25) jobs within sixty (60) months following the date required by the MMEIA and prescribed by written agreement between the MMEIA and the enterprise establishing the project described in item 1 of this subparagraph (iv); and

3. In which the average annual wages of the jobs created by such project are at least one hundred ten percent (110%) of the most recently published average annual wage of the state, as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security.

“Qualified job” means full-time employment in this state within the project site of a qualified business or industry that has qualified to receive an incentive payment pursuant to Sections 57-99-1 through 57-99-9, which employment did not exist in this state before the date of approval by the MDA of the application of the qualified business or industry pursuant to the provisions of Sections 57-99-1 through 57-99-9. “Qualified job” also shall include full-time employment in this state of employees who are employed by an entity other than the establishment that has qualified to receive an incentive payment such as employees who are leased to and managed by the qualified business or industry, if such employment did not exist in this state before the date of approval by the MDA of the application of the establishment; provided, however, that in order for a qualified business or industry to receive incentive payments for such employees, the actual employer of the employees must agree to such payments being made to the qualified business or industry.

“Full-time employment” means a job of at least thirty-five (35) hours per week.

“Rebate amount” means the amount of Mississippi income taxes withheld from employees in qualified jobs that is available for rebate to the qualified business or industry, provided that:

Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (d), the rebate amount shall be three and one-half percent (3-1/2%) of the wages and taxable benefits for qualified jobs; and

In no event shall incentive payments exceed the actual Mississippi income taxes withheld from employees in qualified jobs that are available for rebate to the qualified business or industry.

“MDA” means the Mississippi Development Authority.

“MMEIA” means the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 303, § 17; Laws, 2007, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 14; Laws, 2013, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 7; Laws, 2016, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 8, 2016).

§ 57-99-3.
Quarterly incentive payments to qualified companies and their affiliates; duration of payments; application; job requirements; notification of Department of Revenue.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a qualified business or industry that meets the qualifications specified in Sections 57-99-1 through 57-99-9 may receive quarterly incentive payments for a period not to exceed twenty-five (25) years from the Department of Revenue pursuant to the provisions of Sections 57-99-1 through 57-99-9 in an amount which shall be equal to the lesser of three and one-half percent (3-1/2%) of the wages and taxable benefits for qualified jobs or the actual amount of Mississippi income tax withheld by the employer for the qualified jobs. A qualified business or industry may elect the date upon which the incentive rebate period will begin. Such date may not be later than sixty (60) months after the date the business or industry applied for incentive payments; however, in the case of a qualified business or industry described in Section 57-99-1(a)(ii), such date may not be later than seventy-two (72) months after the date the business or industry applied for incentive payments, or for a qualified business or industry described in Section 57-99-1(a)(iv), such date may not be later than the date that is sixty (60) months after the earlier of:

The date the qualified business or industry applied for incentive payments; or

The start of commercial production as defined in a definitive agreement between such qualified business or industry and the MDA.

In order to receive incentive payments, an establishment shall apply to the MDA. The application shall be on a form prescribed by the MDA and shall contain such information as may be required by the MDA to determine if the applicant is qualified.

In order to qualify to receive such payments, the establishment applying shall be required to:

Be engaged in a qualified business or industry; and

The business or industry must create and maintain the minimum number of qualified jobs as set forth in Section 57-99-1. Establishments that are approved as a qualified business or industry under Sections 57-99-1 through 57-99-9 may not receive incentive payments under Section 57-62-1 et seq.

Upon approval of such an application, the MDA shall notify the Department of Revenue and shall provide it with a copy of the approved application. The Department of Revenue may require the qualified business or industry to submit such additional information as may be necessary to administer the provisions of Sections 57-99-1 through 57-99-9. The qualified business or industry shall report to the Department of Revenue periodically to show its continued eligibility for incentive payments. The qualified business or industry may be audited by the Department of Revenue to verify such eligibility.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 303, § 18; Laws, 2007, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 15; Laws, 2016, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 8, 2016).

§ 57-99-5.
Creation of MMEIA Withholding Rebate Fund, purpose.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the “MMEIA Withholding Rebate Fund,” into which shall be deposited withholding tax revenue required to be deposited into such fund pursuant to Section 27-7-312. The money in the fund shall be used for the purpose of making the incentive payments authorized under Sections 57-99-1 through 57-99-9.

The liability of the State of Mississippi to make the incentive payments authorized under Sections 57-99-1 through 57-99-9 shall be limited to the balance contained in the fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 303, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 2, 2007.).

§ 57-99-7.
Filing of claim for incentive payments; payments dependent on verification of number of qualified jobs created and maintained.

As soon as practicable after the end of a calendar quarter for which a qualified business or industry has qualified to receive an incentive payment, the qualified business or industry shall file a claim for the payment with the State Tax Commission and shall specify the actual number of qualified jobs created and maintained by the business or industry for the calendar quarter and the wages and taxable benefits thereof. The State Tax Commission shall verify the actual number of qualified jobs created and maintained by the business or industry. If the State Tax Commission is not able to provide such verification utilizing all available resources, the State Tax Commission may request such additional information from the business or industry as may be necessary.

The business or industry must meet the job requirements of Sections 57-99-1 through 57-99-9 for four (4) consecutive calendar quarters prior to payment of the first incentive payment. If the business or industry does not maintain the job requirements of Sections 57-99-1 through 57-99-9 at any other time during the twenty-five-year period after the date the first payment was made, the incentive payments shall not be made and shall not be resumed until such time as the actual verified number of qualified jobs created and maintained by the business or industry equals or exceeds the requirements of Sections 57-99-1 through 57-99-9 for one (1) calendar quarter.

An establishment that has qualified pursuant to Sections 57-99-1 through 57-99-9 may receive payments only in accordance with the provision under which it initially applied and was approved. If an establishment that is receiving incentive payments expands, it may apply for additional incentive payments based on the wages and taxable benefits for qualified jobs anticipated from the expansion only, pursuant to Sections 57-99-1 through 57-99-9.

As soon as practicable after verification of the qualified business or industry meeting the requirements of Sections 57-99-1 through 57-99-9 and all rules and regulations, the Department of Finance and Administration, upon requisition of the State Tax Commission, shall issue a warrant drawn on the MMEIA Withholding Rebate Fund to the establishment in the amount of the rebate as determined pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for the calendar quarter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 303, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 2, 2007.).

§ 57-99-9.
Promulgation of rules and regulations by the Mississippi Development Authority and State Tax Commission.

The MDA and the State Tax Commission shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, and all application forms and other forms necessary to implement their respective duties and responsibilities under the provisions of Sections 57-99-1 through 57-99-9.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 303, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 2, 2007.).